Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1531XS (2) 91 ss/ko S.F. 117 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 155A.49 Restrictions on 1 prescribing, ordering, dispensing, and administering authority by 2 board or employer. 3 1. The board or any board created under chapter 147 that 4 licenses a pharmacist or a practitioner and any employer of a 5 pharmacist or practitioner shall not restrict the prescribing, 6 ordering, dispensing, or administering authority of a 7 pharmacist or practitioner, consistent with the pharmacistâs 8 or practitionerâs scope of practice, in a way that acts 9 as a deterrent for a pharmacist or practitioner to use a 10 medication or treatment in accordance with the pharmacistâs or 11 practitionerâs best professional judgment. 12 2. Any restriction by an employer of a pharmacist or 13 practitioner that is prohibited under subsection 1, whether 14 or not documented by the employer as part of a contract, 15 agreement, or employee handbook, by an amendment to any such 16 document, or by any other means, is unenforceable and shall not 17 be the basis for any disciplinary action by the employer. 18 3. A pharmacist or practitioner who uses a medication or 19 treatment in accordance with the pharmacistâs or practitionerâs 20 best professional judgment and consistent with the pharmacistâs 21 or practitionerâs scope of practice under this section shall 22 not be subject to licensee discipline. 23